Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 4. Retirement

Cross references. —

As to state social security provisions generally, see §§

9-3-301

through

9-3-306

.

Revision of article. —

Laws 1987, ch. 202, § 1, revised this article by repealing and recreating former §§

9-3-401

through

9-3-435

as present §§

9-3-401

through

9-3-429

.

Former §§

9-3-404

and

9-3-424

(present §§

9-3-404

and

9-3-408

) were also amended by Laws 1987, chs. 175 and 7, respectively. These sections are set out as reconciled by the legislative service office.

No detailed explanation of the changes made by Laws 1987, chs. 7, 175 and 202, has been attempted, but, where appropriate, annotations to cases decided under former provisions have been placed under comparable sections where it was felt they would be useful. For tables of comparative sections, see Volume 11 of the Wyoming Statutes Annotated.

Purpose of act. —

Laws 1987, ch. 202, § 3, provides:

“(a)

The purpose of this act is to repeal obsolete, duplicative and fully executed statutes and, generally, to clarify Wyoming retirement board duties and other provisions of the Wyoming Retirement Act.

“(b)

It is the intention of the legislature in this act to continue without substantive change the Wyoming Retirement Act benefit program in effect as of the effective date of this act. No change made by this act shall be interpreted to increase, reduce, expand or otherwise substantively change or modify in any manner the benefit program or any part thereof in effect as of the effective date of this act.”

Laws 1987, ch. 202, § 4, makes the act effective on May 22, 1987.

Early retirement plan. —

Laws 1987, ch. 186, §§ 1 through 3, provides for an early retirement option to state employees.

Laws 1987, ch. 186, § 4, provides: “The amount of money necessary to meet the bonus payments and medical and health insurance payments under this act is appropriated from the fund and account from which an electing employee's salary has been paid prior to the election to be credited periodically to the state retirement account as bonus payments are made and to the state group health insurance carrier as monthly state health insurance premium payments are made.”

Laws 1987, ch. 186, § 5, provides: “No vacancy in a position created by an election under this act shall be filled without the approval of the governor.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Employer's liability, under state law, for fraud or misrepresentation inducing employee to take early retirement, 14 ALR5th 537.

Forfeiture of pension plan benefits as affected by Employee Retirement Income Security Act (29 USC §§ 1001 et seq.), 57 ALR Fed 661.

Validity, under § 302(c)(5) of the Labor Management Relations Act (29 USC § 186(c)(5)), of trust fund eligibility provisions regarding health, compensation and retirement benefits, 58 ALR Fed 171.

What constitutes employer's “withdrawal” from multiemployer pension plan, under §§ 4203 and 4205 of Employee Retirement Income Security Act (29 USC §§ 1383 and 1385), so as to result in liability to plan, 101 ALR Fed 173.